el: Χαρακτηριστικά ασφαλείας για κόφτη νήματος: Κλείδωμα λεπίδας; Μηχανισμός ασφαλείας για παιδιά; Προστατευτικό δακτύλων; Περιλαμβάνεται προστατευτική θήκη; Αναδιπλούμενη λεπίδα; Καπάκι ασφαλείας; Κάλυμμα ασφαλείας; Επικαλυμμένη μύτη; Άλλο
fi: Ketjuleikkurin turvaominaisuudet: Terälukko; Lapsilukollinen mekanismi; Sormisuoja; Suojakotelo sisältyy; Sisäänvedettävä terä; Suojakorkki; Suojakansi; Tuppikärki; Muu
hr-HR: Sigurnosne značajke rezača konca: Zaključavanje oštrice; Mehanizam za zaštitu djece; Štitnik za prste; Uključena zaštitna kutija; Uvlačiva oštrica; Sigurnosni poklopac; Sigurnosni pokrov; Zaštićeni vrh; Ostalo
lt-LT: Siūlų kirpiklio saugos ypatybės: Ašmenų užraktas; Apsauginis mechanizmas nuo vaikų; Pirštų apsauga; Pridedamas apsauginis dėklas; Ištraukiami ašmenys; Apsauginis dangtelis; Apsauginis gaubtas; Antgalis su įmaute; Kita
pt-BR: Características de segurança do cortador de cabos: Trava de lâmina; Mecanismo resistente a crianças; Protetor de dedo; Estojo protetor incluído; Lâmina retrátil; Tampa de segurança; Capa de segurança; Ponta com bainha; Outros
es: Características de seguridad del cortador de hilo: Bloqueo de hoja; Mecanismo a prueba de niños; Protector de dedos; Funda protectora incluida; Hoja retráctil; Tapa de seguridad; Cubierta de seguridad; Punta enfundada; Otro
zh-TW: 剪線器安全功能: 刀片鎖定; 防兒童誤觸機制; 護指器; 附保護盒; 可伸縮刀片; 安全帽蓋; 安全保護蓋; 刀尖護套; 其他
de: Sicherheitsmerkmale des Fadenabschneiders: Klingenarretierung; Kindersicherung; Fingerschutz; Inklusive Schutzhülle; Einziehbare Klinge; Schutzkappe; Schutzabdeckung; Ummantelte Spitze; Sonstige
vi: Tính năng an toàn của dụng cụ cắt chỉ: Khóa lưỡi cắt; Cơ chế chống trẻ em mở; Bảo vệ ngón tay; Kèm hộp bảo vệ; Lưỡi cắt có thể thu gọn; Nắp an toàn; Vỏ bọc an toàn; Đầu bọc vỏ; Khác
ja: ねじ切りカッター安全機能: ブレードロック; チャイルドレジスタンス機構; フィンガーガード; 保護ケース付属; 収納式ブレード; 安全キャップ; 安全カバー; 先端カバー付き; その他
pt-PT: Características de segurança do cortador de fios: Bloqueio de lâmina; Mecanismo à prova de crianças; Proteção de dedos; Estojo de proteção incluído; Lâmina retrátil; Tampa de segurança; Cobertura de segurança; Ponta revestida; Outras
tr: İplik kesici güvenlik özellikleri: Bıçak kilidi; Çocuk korumalı mekanizma; Parmak koruması; Koruyucu kılıf dahil; Geri çekilebilir bıçak; Güvenlik kapağı; Güvenlik kılıfı; Kılıflı uç; Diğer
sk-SK: Bezpečnostné prvky rezačky závitov: Zámok čepele; Mechanizmus odolný voči deťom; Chránič prstov; Ochranné puzdro v balení; Zaťahovacia čepeľ; Bezpečnostný uzáver; Bezpečnostný kryt; Chránený hrot; Iné
zh-CN: 断线器安全功能: 刀片锁; 儿童安全防范机制; 护指; 含保护套; 可伸缩刀片; 安全帽; 安全罩; 带套尖端; 其他
cs: Bezpečnostní prvky odstřihovače nití: Zámek čepele; Mechanismus s dětskou pojistkou; Chránič prstů; Včetně ochranného pouzdra; Zasouvací čepel; Bezpečnostní krytka; Bezpečnostní kryt; Chráněná špička; Ostatní
ro-RO: Caracteristici de siguranță ale tăietorului de ață: Blocare lamă; Mecanism cu siguranță pentru copii; Protecție pentru degete; Husă de protecție inclusă; Lamă retractabilă; Capac de protecție; Înveliș de protecție; Vârf cu teacă; Altele
nl: Veiligheidsvoorzieningen draadsnijder: Mesvergrendeling; Kindveilig mechanisme; Vingerbescherming; Inclusief beschermhoes; Intrekbaar mesje; Veiligheidsdop; Veiligheidshoes; Ommantelde punt; Overige
pl: Funkcje bezpieczeństwa obcinacza nici: Blokada ostrza; Mechanizm zabezpieczający przed dziećmi; Osłona palców; W zestawie etui ochronne; Wysuwane ostrze; Zatyczka zabezpieczająca; Osłona zabezpieczająca; Osłonięta końcówka; Inne
sl-SI: Varnostne lastnosti rezila za sukanec: Zaklep rezila; Mehanizem, varen za otroke; Ščitnik za prste; Vključen zaščitni etui; Zložljivo rezilo; Varnostni pokrovček; Varnostni pokrov; Zaščitena konica; Drugo
en: Thread cutter safety features: Blade lock; Child-resistant mechanism; Finger guard; Protective case included; Retractable blade; Safety cap; Safety cover; Sheathed tip; Other
bg-BG: Функции за безопасност на резачка за конци: Заключване на острието; Механизъм със защита за деца; Предпазител за пръсти; Включен предпазен калъф; Прибиращо се острие; Предпазна капачка; Предпазен капак; Защитен връх; Друго
ru: Функции безопасности ниткореза: Блокировка лезвия; Защита от детей; Защита пальцев; Защитный чехол в комплекте; Выдвижное лезвие; Защитный колпачок; Защитная крышка; Наконечник с чехлом; Другое
nb: Sikkerhetsfunksjoner for trådkutter: Bladlås; Barnesikret mekanisme; Fingerbeskyttelse; Beskyttelsesetui inkludert; Uttrekkbart blad; Sikkerhetshette; Sikkerhetsdeksel; Beskyttet tupp; Annet
fr: Dispositifs de sécurité des tarauds: Verrouillage de lame; Mécanisme à l’épreuve des enfants; Protège-doigt; Étui de protection inclus; Lame rétractable; Embout de sécurité; Couvercle de sécurité; Pointe gainée; Autre
ko: 실 커터 안전 기능: 칼날 잠금; 어린이 보호 장치; 손가락 보호대; 보호 케이스 포함; 수납식 칼날; 안전 캡; 안전 커버; 피복 처리된 팁; 기타
th: คุณสมบัติเพื่อความปลอดภัยของเครื่องตัดเกลียว: ที่ล็อกใบมีด; กลไกป้องกันเด็ก; ที่ป้องกันนิ้ว; มาพร้อมเคสป้องกัน; ใบมีดพับเก็บได้; ปลอกสวมนิรภัย; ฝาครอบนิรภัย; ปลายหุ้มปลอก; อื่นๆ
it: Funzionalità di sicurezza del tagliafile: Blocco lama; Meccanismo a prova di bambino; Protezione per le dita; Custodia protettiva inclusa; Lama retrattile; Cappuccio di sicurezza; Copertura di sicurezza; Punta con guaina; Altro
da: Sikkerhedsfunktioner for trådklipper: Klingelås; Børnesikret mekanisme; Fingerbeskyttelse; Inklusive beskyttelsesetui; Indtrækbar klinge; Sikkerhedshætte; Sikkerhedscover; Beklædt spids; Andet
hu: Cérnavágó biztonsági jellemzői: Pengerögzítő; Gyerekzár; Ujjvédő; Védőtokkal; Visszahúzható penge; Biztonsági kupak; Biztonsági burkolat; Tokos hegy; Egyéb
sv: Säkerhetsfunktioner för trådskärare: Bladlås; Barnsäker mekanism; Fingerskydd; Skyddsfodral ingår; Infällbart blad; Säkerhetslock; Säkerhetsskydd; Mantlad spets; Annat